District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.15

Expired

Reimbursement of excess premium costs.

Expired.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2115
as added Mar. 2, 1991, D.C. Law 8-196, § 2, 37 DCR 6735
1981 Ed., § 1-622.15.

Expiration of Law 8-196

Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-196, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 10-133 and § 2 of D.C. Law 10-213, provided that the act shall expire 6 years after its having taken effect.

Pursuant to Law 10-213 this section expired on March 3, 1997.